Washington statutes.
RCW 18.08.340

Board—Rules—Executive director.

(1) The board may adopt such rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as are necessary for the proper performance of its duties under this chapter.

(2) The director shall employ an executive director subject to approval by the board.

[ 2010 c 129 s 4; 2002 c 86 s 201; 1985 c 37 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: "(1) Sections 201 through 240 and 242 through 401 of this act take effect January 1, 2003.

(2) Section 241 of this act takes effect July 1, 2003." [ 2002 c 86 s 403.]

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.